Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 6. False or Frivolous Liens

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-601.
False or frivolous liens; damages; penalties.

Any claim of lien against a federal, state or local official or employee based on the performance or nonperformance of that official’s or employee’s duties shall be invalid unless accompanied by a specific order from a court of competent jurisdiction authorizing the filing of the lien or unless a specific statute authorizes the filing of the lien. A federal, state or local official or employee may discharge a lien under subsection (b) or (d) of this section.

Any person whose real or personal property is subject to a recorded claim of lien who believes the claim of lien is invalid under subsection (a) of this section, was forged, or that the lien claimant knew at the time of filing that the lien was groundless, contained a material misstatement or false claim, may petition the court having jurisdiction over the lien of the county in which the claim of lien has been recorded for the relief provided in this subsection. The petition shall state the grounds upon which relief is requested, and shall be supported by the affidavit of the petitioner or his attorney setting forth a concise statement of the facts upon which the motion is based. The clerk of court shall assign a case number to the petition and obtain from the petitioner a filing fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00). Upon the filing of the petition the following shall apply:

The court may enter its order, which may be granted ex parte, directing the lien claimant to appear before the court at a time no earlier than six (6) nor later than fifteen (15) days following the date of service of the petition, and order the lien claimant to show cause, if any, why the relief provided in this subsection should not be granted;

The order shall clearly state that if the lien claimant fails to appear at the time and place noted, the claim of lien shall be stricken and released, and that the lien claimant shall be ordered to pay damages of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or actual damages, whichever is greater, and the costs incurred by the petitioner, including reasonable attorneys’ fees;

The order and petition shall be served upon the lien claimant by personal service, or, where the court determines that service by mail or other comparable method of delivery is likely to give actual notice, the court may order that service be made by mailing or delivering copies of the petition and order to the lien claimant at his last known address or any other address determined by the court to be appropriate. Two (2) copies shall be sent, one (1) by ordinary first class mail and the other by a form of mail or other delivery method requiring a signed receipt showing when and to whom it was delivered. The envelopes shall bear the return address of the sender;

If, following a hearing on the matter the court determines that the claim of lien is invalid under subsection (a) of this section, was forged or that the lien claimant knew at the time of filing that the lien was groundless or contained a material misstatement or false claim, the court shall issue an order striking and releasing the claim of lien and awarding damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or actual damages, whichever is greater, costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the petitioner to be paid by the lien claimant;

If the court determines that the claim of lien is valid, the court shall issue an order so stating and shall award costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the lien claimant to be paid by the petitioner.

Any person who offers to have recorded or filed a forged or groundless lien in violation of this section with the intent to threaten, harass or intimidate a public official or employee in the performance or nonperformance of his official duties is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any federal, state or local official or employee whose real or personal property is subject to a recorded claim of lien who believes the claim of lien is invalid under subsection (a) of this section may record an affidavit as affiant with the county clerk stating that the claim of lien has been filed against him in his individual capacity for the performance or nonperformance of actions in his capacity as a government official or employee. The person alleging the claim of lien was filed in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall provide notice of the filing of the affidavit to the lien claimant at the address provided on the lien statement pursuant to W.S. 29-1-312(b) by first class mail. Upon the filing of the affidavit, the lien claimant shall have twenty (20) days to file a petition in the district court for the county in which the lien statement was filed stating that the claim of lien is valid under the laws of the United States or of the state of Wyoming. If the lien claimant fails to file the petition within the time specified, the affiant may present a copy of the affidavit to the district court clerk for the county in which the lien statement was filed showing the date it was recorded and the district court clerk shall issue a certification that no petition has been filed in response to the affidavit. Upon recording of a certification issued under this subsection with the county clerk, the lien shall be null and void and of no further force or effect. Upon the filing of the petition by the lien claimant the following shall apply:

The court may enter its order directing the lien claimant to appear before the court at a time no earlier than six (6) nor later than fifteen (15) days following the date of service of the petition, and order the lien claimant to show cause, if any, why the relief provided in this subsection should not be granted;

The order shall clearly state that if the lien claimant fails to appear at the time and place noted, the claim of lien shall be stricken and released, and that the lien claimant shall be ordered to pay damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or actual damages, whichever is greater, and the costs incurred by the petitioner, including reasonable attorneys’ fees;

If, following a hearing on the matter the court determines that the claim of lien is invalid under subsection (a) of this section the court shall issue an order striking and releasing the claim of lien and awarding damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or actual damages, whichever is greater, costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the petitioner to be paid by the lien claimant;

If the court determines that the claim of lien is valid, the court shall issue an order so stating and shall award costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the lien claimant to be paid by the affiant.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1; 2013 ch. 53, § 1, effective March 15, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective March 15, 2013, added the last sentence in (a); and added (d).

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 53, § 3, directs: “This act shall apply to all liens filed on or after March 15, 2013.”

Medicaid lien. —

When the Department of Health asserted a lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, the spouse's estate was not entitled to relief for the filing of a false lien because the lien was valid. Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted in

Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(May 30, 2014).